Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2358.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1725.1-A(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added July 11, 2024 (P.L.618, No.55), is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1725.1-A. Funding for Cyber Charter Schools.--(a) [There] Except as provided under subsection (e), there shall be no tuition charge for a resident or nonresident student attending a cyber charter school.* * *(e) (1) A school district with an approved online learning program shall be exempt from paying the per-student cyber 12345678910111213141516171819 charter school tuition for students residing in the school district and attending an outside cyber charter school if the school district online learning program meets criteria established by the department.(2) The department shall collaborate with the Pennsylvania Association of School Administrators and the Pennsylvania Association of School Business Officials to develop and maintain criteria by which a school district shall be exempt from paying the per-student cyber charter school tuition for students residing in the district and attending an outside cyber charter school.(3) The criteria may include requirements that programs:(i) Provide an in-person orientation for students and parents.(ii) Allow school districts to verify student residency.(iii) Track student attendance, participation and course completion.(iv) Provide daily access to technical support.(v) Provide flexible learning options, including full-time and part-time enrollment and asynchronous and synchronous instruction.(vi) Assign a case manager to students with an individualized education program.(vii) Provide new students with orientation programs and probationary periods.(viii) Monitor student performance regularly.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2358PN3135 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627